Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1060.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 806.5. Veteran status screening of new patients.(a) Duty.--A health care provider and a health care practitioner shall screen a new patient for veteran status prior to formally consulting with or providing treatment to the new patient.(b) Inquiry.--The screening of veteran status shall be 12345678910111213141516171819202122 conducted by asking the new patient the following inquiry:Have you ever served in the United States military, armed forces or uniformed services, including the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marines, Navy, Space Force, National Guard, Reserves, U.S. Public Health Service and National Oceanic and Atmospheric Association?(c) Prohibition.--A health care provider or health care practitioner may not deny care to a patient for refusal to share information solicited under this section.(d) Applicability.--This section shall not apply in an emergency or life-threatening situation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB1060PN1273 - 2 - 123456789101112